Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2666.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Digital Afterlife Consent and AI Identity Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence" or "AI."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:1234567891011121314151617 (i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under paragraph (1) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Artificial intelligence simulation." An automated system, including an artificial intelligence system, that produces text, audio, video, images, interactive responses or any other interaction on a digital platform that represents or simulates a user."Digital platform." Any of the following with more than 1,000,000 registered users that stores user-generated content:(1) Online service.(2) Social media platform.(3) Messaging service.(4) Digital application."Extended inactivity." A continuous period of no user login or verified interaction for a five-year period."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulates the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content."Personally authorized representative." An individual that a user has previously designated as authorized to make decisions regarding the user's digital platform accounts after death."Post mortem simulation." The generation of content, interaction or communication by artificial intelligence that purports to originate from or represent a deceased individual.20260HB2666PN3701 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Synthetic content." Information that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence such as images, videos, audio clips or text."User." An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and maintains an account on a digital platform.Section 3. Requirement of explicit opt-in consent.(a) Requirements.--A digital platform may not deploy artificial intelligence simulation of a user after death or extended inactivity unless:(1) The user has provided clear and conspicuous opt-in consent, separate from general terms of service.(2) The consent specifically identifies:(i) the categories of content that may be generated;(ii) the duration of post mortem simulation; and(iii) whether private communications may be used.(3) The digital platform has informed the user in plain language of how the user's data will be used and whether the AI system will continue public posting digital platform content, private messaging or interactive engagement.(b) Revocation and expiration.--Consent under this section must be revocable at any time and expires two years after the user's date of death unless renewed by the user's estate.Section 4. Default prohibition.Absent explicit opt-in consent under section 3(a)(1), a digital platform shall:(1) disable artificial intelligence simulation of the user;(2) refrain from generating content that appears to originate from the user; and(3) clearly mark the account as inactive or 20260HB2666PN3701 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 memorialized, if applicable.Section 5. Estate and digital executor rights.(a) Rights.--Upon verification of death, a legally authorized representative, executor or administrator of the deceased individual's estate may:(1) revoke prior consent;(2) terminate AI simulation; and(3) request deletion of AI-generated content created after death.(b) Override.--No digital platform may override a valid estate directive under this section.(c) Other authorized representatives.--If a deceased individual has no legally authorized representative, executor or administrator of their estate as specified in subsection (a), a personally authorized representative shall be considered an authorized representative to make decisions relating to the user's digital platform account.Section 6. Transparency and labeling requirements.(a) Labeling.--A digital platform shall include a disclosure with any content generated by an artificial intelligence simulation that includes all of the following criteria:(1) The disclosure identifies digital content as artificial intelligence.(2) The disclosure is clear, conspicuous, appropriate for the medium of the digital content and understandable to a reasonable person.(3) To the extent that it is technically feasible and reasonable, the disclosure shall convey all of the following directly or through a link to a publicly accessible Internet website:20260HB2666PN3701 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The name and version number of the artificial intelligence simulation that created or altered the content.(ii) The time and date of the content's creation or alteration.(iii) A unique identifier.(4) The disclosure is consistent with widely acceptable industry standards.(5) The disclosure is permanent or not reasonably removable to the extent it is technically feasible.(b) Failure to label.--Failure to label artificial intelligence simulation in accordance with subsection (a) constitutes a violation of this act.Section 7. Prohibition on commercial exploitation without separate consent.A digital platform may not monetize, advertise or commercially exploit post mortem simulations without consent provided prior to death and written confirmation from the estate representative. This consent must be provided in a clear and conspicuous manner separate from the general terms of service and explicit opt-in consent provided in section 4. Consent under this section must be revocable at any time and expires five years after the user's date of death unless renewed by the user's estate.Section 8. Enforcement.(a) Separate violations.--Each instance shall constitute a separate violation under this act.(b) Attorney General.--The Attorney General may bring an action for:(1) civil penalties, which shall not be less than $5,000 20260HB2666PN3701 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and not more than $10,000 per violation;(2) injunctive relief; and(3) restitution.(c) Private right of action.--A private right of action is available to:(1) an affected individual, if living; or(2) an affected individual's estate or authorized representative, if the affected individual is deceased.Section 9. Intellectual property rights.Digital platform accounts belonging to a user under this act are a form of nontransferable intellectual property for the purposes of interpreting 47 U.S.C. § 230 (relating to protection for private blocking and screening of offensive materials).Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20260HB2666PN3701 - 6 - 123456789101112131415